Illinois, session 104th, SB150.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 59-9.6 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/9-9.6 new)7    Sec. 9-9.6. Disclosure of political communications 8generated by artificial intelligence.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Artificial intelligence" means a machine-based system 11that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make 12predictions, recommendations, or decisions influencing real or 13virtual environments, and that uses machine and human-based 14inputs to do all of the following:15        (1) perceive real and virtual environments;16        (2) abstract such perceptions into models through 17    analysis in an automated manner; and18        (3) use model inference to formulate options for 19    information or action.20    "Distribution platform" includes, but is not limited to, a 21website or a regularly published newspaper, magazine, or other 22periodical of general circulation, including an Internet 23publication or electronic publication, that routinely carries   SB0150- 2 -LRB104 06586 SPS 16622 b1news and commentary of general interest.2    "Qualified political advertisement" means any paid 3advertisement, including, but not limited to, search engine 4marketing, display advertisements, video advertisements, 5native advertisements, issue advertisements, messaging service 6advertisements, mobile application advertisements, and 7sponsorships, relating to a candidate for federal, State, or 8local office in this State, any election to federal, State, or 9local office in this State, or a ballot question that contains 10any image, audio, or video that is generated in whole or 11substantially with the use of artificial intelligence.12    (b) If a person, committee, or other entity creates, 13originally publishes, or originally distributes a qualified 14political advertisement, the qualified political advertisement 15shall include, in a clear and conspicuous manner, a statement 16that the qualified political advertisement was generated in 17whole or substantially by artificial intelligence as follows:18        (1) if the qualified political advertisement is a 19    graphic communication, the statement shall appear in 20    letters at least as large as the majority of the text in 21    the graphic communication and be in the same language as 22    the language used in the graphic communication;23        (2) if the qualified political advertisement is an 24    audio communication, the statement shall be spoken in a 25    clearly audible and intelligible manner at the beginning 26    or end of the communication, last at least 3 seconds, and   SB0150- 3 -LRB104 06586 SPS 16622 b1    be in the same language as the language used in the audio 2    communication; and3        (3) if the qualified political advertisement is a 4    video communication that also includes audio, that 5    statement shall:6            (A) appear for at least 4 seconds in letters at 7        least as large as the majority of any text 8        communication, or if there is no other text 9        communication, in a size that is easily readable by 10        the average viewer;11            (B) be spoken in a clearly audible and 12        intelligible manner at the beginning or end of the 13        communication and last at least 3 seconds; and14            (C) be in the same language as the language used in 15        the video communication; and16    (c) A person who violates subsection (b) is subject to the 17following:18        (1) for a first violation, the Board may impose on the 19    person a civil penalty of not more than $250; and20        (2) for a second or subsequent violation, the Board 21    may impose on the person a civil penalty of not more than 22    $1,000 for each violation.23    Each qualified political advertisement that is distributed 24or aired to the public that violates this Section is a separate 25violation.26    (d) This Section does not apply to any of the following:  SB0150- 4 -LRB104 06586 SPS 16622 b1        (1) a radio or television broadcasting station, 2    including a cable or satellite television operator, 3    programmer, or producer that broadcasts a qualified 4    political advertisement or a communication generated in 5    whole or substantially by artificial intelligence as part 6    of a bona fide newscast, news interview, news documentary, 7    or on-the-spot coverage of bona fide news events, if the 8    broadcast clearly acknowledges through content or a 9    disclosure, in a manner that can be easily heard or read by 10    the average listener or viewer, that the qualified 11    political advertisement or communication generated in 12    whole or substantially by artificial intelligence does not 13    accurately represent the speech or conduct of the depicted 14    individual;15        (2) a radio or television broadcasting station, 16    including a cable or satellite television operator, 17    programmer, or producer, when the station is paid to 18    broadcast qualified political advertisements;19        (3) a distribution platform that publishes qualified 20    political advertisements prohibited under this Section, if 21    the distribution platform has a clearly stated written 22    policy, provided to any person, committee, or other entity 23    that creates, seeks to publish, or originally distributes 24    a qualified political advertisement, that the qualified 25    political advertisement shall include a statement 26    consistent with subsection (b);  SB0150- 5 -LRB104 06586 SPS 16622 b1        (4) a qualified political advertisement that 2    constitutes satire or parody; and3        (5) a business or its affiliate if the business or its 4    affiliate is regulated by the Federal Communications 5    Commission.6    (e) A distribution platform is not liable under this 7Section if the distribution platform can show that it provided 8notice to the distributor of a qualified political 9advertisement of the distribution platform's prohibitions 10concerning the failure to disclose content created in whole or 11substantially by artificial intelligence in a qualified 12political advertisement or prerecorded telephone message.